Utah statutes.
19-5-103.   Water Quality Board -- Members of board -- Appointment -- Terms -- Organization -- Meetings -- Per diem and expenses.

(1)  The board comprises the executive director and 11 members appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate.

(2)  No more than six of the appointed members may be from the same political party.

(3)  The appointed members, insofar as practicable, shall include the following:

(a)  one member representing the mineral industry;

(b)  one member representing the food processing industry;

(c)  one member representing another manufacturing industry;

(d)  two members who are officials of a municipal government or the officials' representative involved in the management or operation of a wastewater treatment facility;

(e)  one member representing agricultural and livestock interests;

(f)  one member representing fish, wildlife, and recreation interests;

(g)  one member representing an improvement or special service district;

(h)  two members at large, one of whom represents organized environmental interests, selected with due consideration of the areas of the state affected by water pollution and not representing other interests named in this Subsection (3); and

(i)  one member representing a local health department.

(4) When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term with the consent of the Senate.

(5) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (5)(b), a member shall be appointed for a term of four years and is eligible for reappointment.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (5)(a), the governor shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately half of the board is appointed every two years.

(6)  A member shall hold office until the expiration of the member's term and until the member's successor is appointed, not to exceed 90 days after the formal expiration of the term.

(7)  The board shall:

(a)  organize and annually select one of its members as chair and one of its members as vice chair;

(b)  hold at least four regular meetings each calendar year; and

(c)  keep minutes of its proceedings which are open to the public for inspection.

(8) The chair may call a special meeting upon the request of three or more members of the board.

(9)  Each member of the board and the executive secretary shall be notified of the time and place of each meeting.

(10)  Seven members of the board constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and the action of a majority of members present is the action of the board.

(11)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

